Arkansas statutes. Constitution Of The State Of Arkansas Of 1874
AMEND. 96.
[GOVERNOR'S RETENTION OF POWERS AND DUTIES WHEN ABSENT FROM THE STATE] (CONST. AMEND. 6, §
4, AMENDED).

Publisher's Notes.

This amendment amended Ark. Const. Amend. 6, § 4, and is incorporated within that section. The amendment was proposed by S.J.R. 3 during the 2015 Regular Session and adopted at the 2016 general election by a vote of 777,973 for and 296,291 against. The amendment was effective December 8, 2016.

The bracketed heading was added by the Publisher.